Maine, session 132, LD1699.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1100-T, sub-§2, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. C, §11, is
amended to read:
2. Eligibility for tax credit certificate for individuals and entities other than
venture capital funds. The authority shall adopt rules in accordance with the Maine
Administrative Procedure Act, Title 5, chapter 375, to implement the program. Without
limitation, the requirements for eligibility for a tax credit certificate include the following.
A. For investments made in tax years beginning before January 1, 2012, a tax credit
certificate may be issued in an amount not more than 40% of the amount of cash
actually invested in an eligible Maine business in any calendar year or in an amount
not more than 60% of the amount of cash actually invested in any one calendar year in
an eligible Maine business located in a high-unemployment area, as determined by rule
by the authority. For investments made in tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2012, a tax credit certificate may be issued to an investor other than a private venture
capital fund in an amount not more than 60% of the amount of cash actually invested
in an eligible Maine business in any calendar year. For investments made in tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a tax credit certificate may be issued to an
investor other than a private venture capital fund in an amount not more than 50% of
the amount of cash actually invested in an eligible Maine business in any calendar year.
For investments made on or after April 1, 2020, a tax credit certificate may be issued
to an investor other than a private venture capital fund in an amount not more than 40%
of the amount of cash actually invested in an eligible Maine business in any calendar
year. For investments made on or after April 1, 2025, a tax credit certificate may be
issued to an investor other than a private venture capital fund in an amount not more
than 40% of the amount of cash actually invested in an agricultural enterprise in any
calendar year. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
B. The Maine business or agricultural enterprise must be determined by the authority
to be a manufacturer or a value-added natural resource enterprise; must provide a
product or service that is sold or rendered, or is projected to be sold or rendered,
predominantly outside of the State, except that, for an agricultural enterprise, the
product or service may be sold inside or outside of the State; must be engaged in the
development or application of advanced technologies; or must be certified as a visual
media production company under Title 5, section 13090‑L. The business must shall
certify that the amount of the investment is necessary to allow the business to create or
retain jobs in the State. The agricultural enterprise shall certify that the amount of the
investment is necessary to allow the agricultural enterprise to expand its enterprise.
C. Aggregate investment eligible for tax credits may not be more than $5,000,000 for
any one business or agricultural enterprise as of the date of issuance of a tax credit
certificate. Beginning with investments made on or after April 1, 2020, aggregate
investment eligible for tax credits may not be more than $3,500,000 for any one
business as of the date of issuance of a tax credit certificate and not more than
$2,000,000 for any calendar year. Beginning with investments made on or after April
1, 2025, aggregate investment eligible for tax credits may not be more than $3,500,000
for any one agricultural enterprise as of the date of issuance of a tax credit certificate
Page 1 - 132LR0964(01)

416 and not more than $2,000,000 for any calendar year. Notwithstanding the other
427 provisions of this paragraph, with respect to a business that was approved by the
438 authority as an eligible business under this subsection before April 1, 2020, the
449 aggregate investment eligible for tax credits may not be more than $5,000,000 for that
550 business as of the date of the issuance of the tax credit certificate, and the $2,000,000
561 annual limitation does not apply.
D. The investment with respect to which any individual is applying for a tax credit
certificate may not be more than an aggregate of $500,000 in any one business or
agricultural enterprise in any 3 consecutive calendar years, except that this paragraph
does not limit other investment by any applicant for which that applicant is not applying
for a tax credit certificate and except that, if the entity applying for a tax credit
certificate is a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, nontaxable trust
or any other entity that is treated as a flow-through entity for tax purposes under the
federal Internal Revenue Code but not as a private venture capital fund, the aggregate
limit of $500,000 applies to each individual partner, member, stockholder, beneficiary
or equity owner of the entity and not to the entity itself.
E. For investments made in tax years beginning before January 1, 2014, the business
receiving the investment must have annual gross sales of $3,000,000 or less. For
investments made in tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, the business or
agricultural enterprise receiving the investment must have annual gross sales of
$5,000,000 or less. The operation of the business or agricultural enterprise must be a
substantial professional activity of at least one of the principal owners, as determined
by the authority. The principal owner and the principal owner's spouse are not eligible
for a credit for investment in that business, except that this restriction does not apply
to an agricultural enterprise. A tax credit certificate may not be issued to a parent,
sibling or child of a principal owner if the parent, sibling or child has any existing
ownership interest in the business or agricultural enterprise.
F. The investment must be expended on plant, equipment, research and development,
or working capital for the business or such other business activity as may be approved
by the authority. For an agricultural enterprise, the investment may also be expended
on infrastructure, which does not include real estate but includes any improvement that
expands the marketing, production or processing of agricultural products, as defined in
Title 7, section 152, subsection 2, as approved by the authority.
G. The authority shall establish limits on repayment of the investment. The investment
must be at risk in the business or agricultural enterprise.
H. The investors qualifying for the credit must each own less than 1/2 of the business.
This paragraph does not apply to an agricultural enterprise.
I. The business or agricultural enterprise receiving the investment may not be in
violation of the requirements of subsection 7.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5216-B, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2017, c. 170, Pt. E, §3, is
further amended to read:
2. Credit. An investor, including, beginning with tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025, an investor in an agricultural enterprise, is entitled to a credit against the
tax otherwise due under this Part equal to the amount of the tax credit certificate issued by
Page 2 - 132LR0964(01)

415 the Finance Authority of Maine in accordance with Title 10, section 1100‑T and as limited
426 by this section. Except with respect to tax credit certificates issued under Title 10, section
437 1100‑T, subsection 2‑C, in the case of partnerships, limited liability companies, S
448 corporations, nontaxable trusts and any other entities that are treated as flow-through
459 entities for tax purposes under the Code, the individual partners, members, stockholders,
560 beneficiaries or equity owners of such entities must be treated as the investors under this
571 section and are allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due from them under this Part in
582 proportion to their respective interests in those partnerships, limited liability companies, S
593 corporations, trusts or other flow-through entities. Except as limited or authorized by
1504 subsection 3 or 4, 25% of the credit must be taken in the taxable year in which the
1515 investment is made and 25% per year must be taken in each of the next 3 taxable years.
1526 With respect to tax credit certificates issued under Title 10, section 1100‑T, subsection 2‑C,
1537 the credits are refundable and the investor shall file a return requesting a refund for an
1548 investment for which it has received a tax credit certificate in the calendar year following
1559 the calendar year during which the investment was made.